Utah statutes.
11-13-310.   Termination of impact alleviation contract.

If the project or any part of it or the facilities providing additional project capacity or any part of them, or the output from the project or facilities providing additional project capacity become subject, in addition to the requirements of Section 11-13-302, to ad valorem property taxation or other payments in lieu of ad valorem property taxation, or other form of tax equivalent payments to any candidate which is a party to an impact alleviation contract with respect to the project or facilities providing additional project capacity or is receiving impact alleviation payments or means with respect to the project or facilities providing additional project capacity pursuant to a determination by the board, then the impact alleviation contract or the requirement to make impact alleviation payments or provide means therefor pursuant to the determination, as the case may be, shall, at the election of the candidate, terminate.  In any event, each impact alleviation contract or determination order shall terminate upon the project, or, in the case of facilities providing additional project capacity, those facilities becoming subject to the provisions of Section 11-13-302, except that no impact alleviation contract or agreement entered by a school district shall terminate because of in lieu ad valorem property tax fees levied under Subsection 11-13-302(2)(b)(i) or because of ad valorem property taxes levied under Section 53A-17a-135 for the state minimum school program.  In addition, if the construction of the project, or, in the case of facilities providing additional project capacity, of those facilities, is permanently terminated for any reason, each impact alleviation contract and determination order, and the payments and means required thereunder, shall terminate.  No termination of an impact alleviation contract or determination order may terminate or reduce any liability previously incurred pursuant to the contract or determination order by the candidate beneficiary under it.  If the provisions of Section 11-13-302, or its successor, are held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, and no ad valorem taxes or other form of tax equivalent payments are payable, the remaining provisions of this chapter shall continue in operation without regard to the commencement of commercial operation of the last generating unit of that project or of facilities providing additional project capacity.



Amended by Chapter 21, 2003 General Session

